Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2417
Assessments made by insurance guaranty associations of other states; not considered taxes, fees, licenses, obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions.

Assessments made by the insurance guaranty associations, or similar entities, pursuant to the laws of any other state shall not be considered taxes, licenses, other fees, other material obligations, prohibitions, or restrictions as those terms are defined in section 44-150.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 17.